Utah statutes.
23-19-17.5.   Lifetime hunting and fishing licenses.

(1)  Lifetime licensees born after December 31, 1965, shall be certified under Section 23-19-11 before engaging in hunting.

(2)  A lifetime license shall remain valid if the residency of the lifetime licensee changes  to another state or country.

(3) (a)  A lifetime license may be used in lieu of a hunting or fishing license.

(b)  Each year, a lifetime licensee is entitled to receive without charge a permit and tag of  the lifetime licensee's choice for one of the following general season deer hunts:

(i)  archery;

(ii)  rifle; or

(iii)  muzzleloader.

(c)  A lifetime licensee is subject to each requirement for special hunting and fishing permits and tags, except as provided in Subsections (3)(a) and (b).

(4)  The Wildlife Board may adopt rules necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

